Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXXV Domestic Relations
Parent and Child

405.010.
Parents entitled to services and earnings of child — Suit for loss of.

The father and mother of a child under the age of eighteen (18) are equally entitled to its services and earnings. If one of the parents is dead, or has abandoned the child, or been deprived of its custody by court decree, the other is entitled to its services and earnings. The parents jointly may maintain an action for loss of the services or earnings of their child under the age of eighteen (18) when the loss is occasioned by an injury wrongfully or negligently inflicted upon the child. But if either the father or mother is dead, or has abandoned the child, or has been deprived of its custody by court decree, or refuses to sue, the other may sue alone. This section shall not affect the existing law relating to workers’ compensation and industrial accidents.

History.

326a-1: amend. Acts 1968, ch. 100, § 18.

405.020.
Custody, nurture, and education of minor child — Physically and mentally disabled children — De facto custodian.

The father and mother shall have the joint custody, nurture, and education of their children who are under the age of eighteen (18). If either of the parents dies, the survivor, if suited to the trust, shall have the custody, nurture, and education of the children who are under the age of eighteen (18). The father shall be primarily liable for the nurture and education of his children who are under the age of eighteen (18) and for any unmarried child over the age of eighteen (18) when the child is a full-time high school student, but not beyond completion of the school year during which the child reaches the age of nineteen (19) years.

The father and mother shall have the joint custody, care, and support of their children who have reached the age of eighteen (18) and who are wholly dependent because of permanent physical or mental disability. If either of the parents dies, the survivor, if suited to the trust, shall have the custody, care, and support of such children.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsections (1) and (2) of this section, a person claiming to be a de facto custodian, as defined in KRS

403.270

, may petition a court for legal custody of a child. The court shall grant legal custody to the person if the court determines that the person meets the definition of de facto custodian and that the best interests of the child will be served by awarding custody to the de facto custodian.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsections (1) and (2) of this section, if either parent dies and at the time of death a child is in the custody of a de facto custodian, as defined in KRS

403.270

, the court shall award custody to the de facto custodian if the court determines that the best interests of the child will be served by that award of custody.

History.

2016: amend. Acts 1952, ch. 138; 1968, ch. 100, § 19; 1986, ch. 360, § 1, effective July 15, 1986; 1992, ch. 434, § 4, effective July 14, 1992; 1998, ch. 250, § 6, effective July 15, 1998.

405.021.
Reasonable visitation rights to grandparents.

The Circuit Court may grant reasonable visitation rights to either the paternal or maternal grandparents of a child and issue any necessary orders to enforce the decree if it determines that it is in the best interest of the child to do so. Once a grandparent has been granted visitation rights under this subsection, those rights shall not be adversely affected by the termination of parental rights belonging to the grandparent’s son or daughter, who is the father or mother of the child visited by the grandparent, unless the Circuit Court determines that it is in the best interest of the child to do so.

If the parent of the child who is the son or daughter of the grandparent is deceased, there shall be a rebuttable presumption that visitation with the grandparent is in the best interest of the child if the grandparent can prove a pre-existing significant and viable relationship with the child.

In order to prove a significant and viable relationship under paragraph (b) of this subsection, the grandparent shall prove by a preponderance of the evidence that:

The child resided with the grandparent for at least six (6) consecutive months with or without the current custodian present;

The grandparent was the caregiver of the child on a regular basis for at least six (6) consecutive months;

The grandparent had frequent or regular contact with the child for at least twelve (12) consecutive months; or

There exist any other facts that establish that the loss of the relationship between the grandparent and the child is likely to harm the child.

The action shall be brought in Circuit Court in the county in which the child resides.

The Circuit Court may grant noncustodial parental visitation rights to the grandparent of a child if the parent of the child who is the son or daughter of the grandparent is deceased and the grandparent has assumed the financial obligation of child support owed by the deceased parent, unless the court determines that the visitation is not in the best interest of the child. If visitation is not granted, the grandparent shall not be responsible for child support.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 277, § 1; 1984, ch. 136, § 1, effective July 13, 1984; 1994, ch. 493, § 1, effective July 15, 1994; 1996, ch. 302, § 1, effective July 15, 1996; 1996, ch. 314, § 2, effective July 15, 1996; 2018 ch. 197, § 1, effective July 14, 2018.

405.023.
Centralized statewide information and referral program for grandparents and other caregivers caring for minors who are not their biological children.

The Cabinet for Health and Family Services shall create a centralized statewide service program that provides information and referrals through a statewide toll-free telephone number to grandparents and other caregivers who are caring for minors who are not their biological children.

The program shall provide information on a wide variety of services, including but not limited to:

Kentucky Transitional Assistance Program;

Health care and services, including the Kentucky Children’s Health Insurance Program;

Educational services;

Child care;

Child support;

Support groups;

Housing assistance;

Legal services; and

Respite care for low-income kinship or fictive kin caregivers.

As used in this paragraph, “fictive kin” has the same meaning as in KRS

600.020

.

The cabinet may coordinate this program with the KyCARES Program.

This program shall be known as the KinCare Support Program.

History.

Enact. Acts 2006, ch. 198, § 1, effective July 12, 2006; 2014, ch. 69, § 1, effective July 15, 2014; 2019 ch. 73, § 2, effective June 27, 2019.

405.024.
Adult caregiver with whom minor resides may, by affidavit, establish authority to make health care treatment and school-related decisions for minor — Conditions — Authority may be revoked or superseded — Obligations and liability of health care provider — Penalty.

As used in this section:

“Cabinet” means the Cabinet for Health and Family Services;

“Caregiver” means an adult person with whom a minor resides, including a grandparent, stepgrandparent, stepparent, aunt, uncle, or any other adult relative of the minor;

“De facto custodian” has the same meaning as defined in KRS

403.270

;

“Department” means the Department of Education;

“Health care provider” means any licensed medical, surgical, dental, psychological, or osteopathic practitioner; nurse practitioner; occupational, physical, or speech therapist; hospital; public or private health clinic; or their agents or employees; and

“Health care treatment”:

Means any necessary medical and dental examination, diagnostic procedure, and treatment, including but not limited to hospitalization, developmental screening, mental health screening and treatment, preventive care, immunizations recommended by the federal Centers for Disease Control and Prevention’s Advisory Committee on Immunization Practices, well-child care, blood testing, and occupational, physical, and speech and language therapies; and

Does not mean any procedure to terminate a pregnancy, pregnancy determination testing, HIV or AIDS testing, controlled substance testing, or any other testing for which a separate court order or informed consent is required under other applicable law.

The caregiver shall create an affidavit establishing the caregiver’s ability to authorize health care treatment for a minor and to make school-related decisions for a minor. The affidavit shall include but not be limited to the following information:

The name and address of the caregiver;

The caregiver’s relationship to the minor to whom the affidavit applies;

A statement that the caregiver is over the age of eighteen (18);

The name and date of birth of the minor to whom the affidavit applies;

A statement that the minor resides in the caregiver’s home;

A statement that the caregiver shall be allowed to authorize the provision of health care treatment to the minor, or to withhold such authorization;

A statement that the caregiver shall be the person responsible for enrolling the minor in school and acting as the minor’s legal contact with the school for the purposes of making decisions on enrollment, attendance, extracurricular activities, discipline, and all other school-related activities;

A statement identifying the minor’s parents, de facto custodian, guardian, or legal custodian and describing the caregiver’s relationship to the parents, de facto custodian, guardian, or legal custodian;

A statement that no other party has legal standing in custody issues for the minor other than those parties identified in paragraph (h) of this subsection;

The dated signatures of the minor’s parents, de facto custodian, guardian, or legal custodian indicating their approval of the caregiver’s ability to authorize the provision of health care treatment to the minor and to make school-related decisions for the minor. If a parent or parents, de facto custodian, guardian, or legal custodian are unavailable to sign the affidavit, the affidavit shall include a statement describing the circumstances of their unavailability and a statement of the caregiver’s reasonable efforts to locate them;

The dated signature of the caregiver;

A statement that acknowledges that a person making false statements in the affidavit shall be subject to criminal penalties;

A statement that acknowledges that execution of the affidavit does not confer upon the caregiver the status of a de facto custodian, guardian, or legal custodian of the minor; and

A statement that acknowledges the requirement for the caregiver to notify any health care provider or school to which the affidavit was presented if the minor ceases to reside with the caregiver or the affidavit is revoked by the minor’s parent or parents, de facto custodian, guardian, legal custodian, or caregiver.

The health care authorization portion of the affidavit described in subsection (2) of this section shall be valid for one (1) year and may be renewed annually thereafter unless it is revoked by the minor’s parent or parents, de facto custodian, guardian, legal custodian, or caregiver, or if the minor no longer resides with the caregiver. Execution or revocation of the health care authorization portion of the affidavit shall not operate as a complete execution or revocation of the entire affidavit.

The education authorization portion of the affidavit described in subsection (2) of this section shall be valid for one (1) year and may be renewed annually thereafter unless it is revoked by the minor’s parent or parents, de facto custodian, guardian, legal custodian, or caregiver, or if the minor no longer resides with the caregiver. Execution or revocation of the education authorization portion of the affidavit shall not operate as a complete execution or revocation of the entire affidavit.

A caregiver may authorize the provision of health care treatment or may refuse the provision of health care treatment to a minor residing with the caregiver if the caregiver presents to a health care provider a duly executed affidavit as described in subsection (2) of this section.

The decision of a caregiver to authorize or refuse health care treatment for a minor shall be superseded by a decision of a parent, de facto custodian, guardian, or legal custodian of the minor.

A health care provider shall honor a caregiver’s authorization to provide health care treatment to a minor, or the caregiver’s decision to withhold such authorization, if the caregiver presents to the provider a duly executed affidavit described in subsection (2) of this section. A health care provider shall refuse to honor the caregiver’s decision to seek or refuse health care treatment if the provider has actual knowledge that a parent, de facto custodian, legal custodian, or guardian has made a superseding decision to authorize or refuse health care treatment for the minor. The provisions of this subsection shall not be construed to prohibit a health care provider from providing health care treatment for a condition that, left untreated, could reasonably be expected to substantially threaten the health or life of the minor.

A person who relies in good faith on a duly executed affidavit as described in subsection (2) of this section in providing or refusing health care treatment shall:

Be under no obligation to undertake further investigation into the circumstances forming the basis of the caregiver’s authorization to the provision or refusal of health care treatment; and

Not be subject to criminal or civil liability or professional disciplinary action because of that reliance.

The provisions of this section shall not be construed to relieve any health care provider from liability for negligence in the provision of health care treatment.

An affidavit described in subsection (2) of this section may be revoked by the minor’s parent, de facto custodian, guardian, legal custodian, or caregiver, and shall be revoked if the minor to whom it applies ceases to reside with the caregiver. If an affidavit is revoked, the caregiver shall give written notice of revocation to any health care provider to which the affidavit was presented for the purpose of obtaining health care for the minor.

A person who knowingly makes a false statement in an affidavit described in subsection (2) of this section shall be guilty of a Class A misdemeanor.

History.

Enact. Acts 2014, ch. 69, § 2, effective July 15, 2014.

405.025.
Parent or guardian liable for willful damage to property caused by minor.

The parent or guardian of any unemancipated minor, in his care and custody, against whom judgment has been rendered for the willful marking upon, defacing or damaging of any property, shall be liable for the payment of that judgment up to an amount not to exceed twenty-five hundred dollars ($2500), if the parent or guardian has been joined as a party defendant in the original action. The judgment provided herein to be paid shall be paid to the owner of the property damaged but such payment shall not be a bar to any criminal action or any proceeding against the unemancipated minor committing such damage for the balance of the judgment not paid by the parent or guardian. No parent or guardian shall be liable under the provisions of this subsection in a cumulative amount in excess of ten thousand dollars ($10,000) for the willful marking upon, defacing or damaging of any property by any child.

Nothing in this section is intended to or shall limit to twenty-five hundred dollars ($2500) the liability of a person to whom the negligence of a minor is imputed by KRS

186.590

, nor shall this section limit the liability set forth in any other statute to the contrary.

History.

Enact. Acts 1968, ch. 44, §§ 1, 2; 1976, ch. 235, § 1.

Opinions of Attorney General.

This section contemplates a civil action for damages and is not applicable to juvenile court proceedings.

OAG 69-251

.

Research References and Practice Aids

Treatises

Petrilli, Kentucky Family Law, Minors, § 30.16.

405.027.
Court may require parent or guardian of minor defendant to pay attorney’s fees and costs.

In any proceeding within this Commonwealth wherein a minor child is a party defendant, it shall be within the sound discretion of the court to direct that the parents or guardian of such minor child pay all attorney’s fees and costs, including but not limited to amounts repayable under KRS

31.120

, of said action as may be reasonable. This section shall not be construed as repealing any of the laws of the Commonwealth relating to parents’ liability for the acts of their minor children, but shall be held and construed as ancillary and supplemental thereto.

History.

Enact. Acts 1980, ch. 334, § 2, effective July 15, 1980.

405.028.
Custody, visitation, and inheritance rights denied parent convicted of a felony sexual offense from which victim delivered a child — Waiver — Child support obligation.

Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, any person who has been convicted of a felony offense under KRS Chapter 510, or a comparable offense from another jurisdiction, in which the victim of that offense has conceived and delivered a child, shall not have custody or visitation rights, or the right of inheritance under KRS Chapter 391 with respect to that child.

The adult mother of the child may waive the protection afforded under subsection (1) of this section regarding visitation and request that the court grant reasonable visitation rights with the child if paternity has been acknowledged.

Unless waived by the mother, or a guardian of a minor mother or a de facto custodian of the child in the case of a minor mother, and, if applicable, the public agency substantially contributing to the support of the child, a court shall establish a child support obligation against the father of the child pursuant to KRS

403.211

. As used in this subsection, “de facto custodian” has the same meaning as in KRS

403.270

.

History.

Enact. Acts 2014, ch. 130, § 2, effective July 15, 2014; 2020 ch. 30, § 2, effective July 15, 2020.

405.030.
Neglect of child under fourteen. [Repealed.]

405.035.
Court ordered assignment to county officer of parent’s child-support payment — Assignment binding upon employer — Priority. [Renumbered.]

405.040.
Abandonment of child under six. [Repealed.]

405.050.
Power of societies to enforce law. [Repealed.]

405.060.
Sale or conveyance in fraud of wife or child — Transfer of income or property to avoid payment to child support creditor.

Any sale or conveyance made to a purchaser with notice or for the benefit of any religious society, if made in fraud or hindrance of the right of wife or child to maintenance, shall be void as against the wife or child.

In any case where an obligor transfers income or property to avoid payment to a child support creditor, the transfer shall be indicia of fraud. Indicia of fraud creates a prima facie case that the transfer of income or property was to avoid payment of child support. Indicia of fraud shall be set forth by administrative regulation.

In any case in which the cabinet knows of a transfer by a child support obligor with respect to which a prima facie case is established, the cabinet shall:

Seek to void the transfer; or

Obtain a settlement in the best interests of the child support creditor.

History.

2126; 1998, ch. 255, § 23, effective July 15, 1998.

405.070.
Provision for children of parent joining certain religious societies.

When a parent of a child joins any religious society whose faith is similar to that of the Shakers without having made adequate provision for his children, the Circuit Court of the county where he resides, or of the county in which any part of his property is situated, if he does not reside in this state, may, upon petition of any next friend, appoint a committee to any infant child, or child of unsound mind, of the father or mother, and make out of the father’s or mother’s estate a provision for the maintenance of the child, and take the child from the father, mother or society, and provide for its custody.

History.

2125: amend. Acts 1974, ch. 386, § 96.

405.075.
Definitions — Anonymity of parent who places newborn infant with emergency provider, police station, fire station, hospital, or participating place of worship — Newborn safety device — Transport to emergency room — Implied consent to treatment — Waiver by parent — Sign posted at facility — Immunity of provider, officer, firefighter, or staff member from liability — Short title.

As used in this section:

“Newborn infant” means an infant who is medically determined to be less than thirty (30) days old;

“Newborn safety device” means a device:

Designed to permit a parent to anonymously place a newborn infant in the device with the intent to leave the newborn and for an emergency medical services provider to remove the newborn from the device and take custody of the newborn infant;

Installed with an adequate dual alarm system connected to the physical location where the device is physically installed. The dual alarm system shall be:

Tested at least one (1) time per month to ensure the alarm system is in working order; and

Visually checked at least two (2) times per day to ensure the alarm system is in working order;

Approved by and physically located inside a participating staffed Class I, Class II, Class III, or Class IV ground ambulance provider, staffed police station, staffed fire station, or staffed hospital that:

Is licensed or otherwise legally operating in this state; and

Is staffed continuously on a twenty-four (24) hour basis every day by a licensed emergency medical services provider; and

Located in an area that is conspicuous and visible to Class I, Class II, Class III, or Class IV ground ambulance provider, police station, fire station, or hospital staff; and

“Participating place of worship” means a recognized place of religious worship that has voluntarily agreed to perform the duty granted in this section and display signage prominently on its premises regarding its participation in this section and its operating hours during which staff will be present.

A parent shall have the right to remain anonymous, shall not be pursued, and shall not be considered to have abandoned or endangered a newborn infant under KRS Chapters 508 and 530 if the parent:

Places a newborn infant:

With an emergency medical services provider;

At a staffed police station, fire station, or hospital;

At a participating place of worship; or

Inside a newborn safety device that meets the requirements of subsection (1) of this section; and

Expresses no intent to return for the newborn infant.

Any emergency medical services provider, police officer, or firefighter who accepts physical custody of a newborn infant, or who physically retrieves a newborn infant from a newborn safety device that meets the requirements of subsection (1) of this section, in accordance with this section shall immediately arrange for the infant to be taken to the nearest hospital emergency room and shall have implied consent to any and all appropriate medical treatment.

Any staff member at a participating place of worship who accepts physical custody of a newborn infant in accordance with this section shall immediately contact the 911 emergency telephone service as set forth in KRS

65.750

to

65.760

, wireless enhanced 911 system as set forth in KRS

65.7621

to

65.7643

, or emergency medical services as set forth in KRS Chapter 311A for transportation to the nearest hospital emergency room.

By placing a newborn infant in the manner described in this section, the parent:

Waives the right to notification required by subsequent court proceedings conducted under KRS Chapter 620 until such time as a claim of parental rights is made; and

Waives legal standing to make a claim of action against any person who accepts physical custody of the newborn infant.

A staffed police station, fire station, hospital, emergency medical facility, or participating place of worship may post a sign easily seen by the public stating that: “This facility is a safe and legal place to surrender a newborn infant who is less than 30 days old. A parent who places a newborn infant at this facility and expresses no intent to return for the infant shall have the right to remain anonymous and not be pursued and shall not be considered to have abandoned or endangered their newborn infant under KRS Chapters 508 and 530.”

Actions taken by an emergency medical services provider, police officer, firefighter, or staff member at a participating place of worship in conformity with the duty granted in this section shall be immune from criminal or civil liability. Nothing in this subsection shall limit liability for negligence.

The provisions of subsection (2) of this section shall not apply when indicators of child physical abuse or child neglect are present.

KRS

211.951

,

216B.190

,

405.075

,

620.350

, and

620.355

shall be known as “The Representative Thomas J. Burch Safe Infants Act.”

History.

Enact. Acts 2002, ch. 303, § 4, effective April 9, 2002; 2016 ch. 122, § 3, effective July 15, 2016; 2018 ch. 152, § 1, effective July 14, 2018; 2021 ch. 117, § 1, effective June 29, 2021; 2022 ch. 45, § 1, effective July 14, 2022.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Law Journal.

Note: Remembering the Endangered “Child”: Limiting the Definition of “Safe Haven” and Looking Beyond the Safe Haven Law Framework, 98 Ky. L.J. 833 (2009/2010).

405.080.
Support of indigent parent. [Repealed.]

405.090.
Supervisor of parents in certain counties. [Repealed.]

405.100.
Duties of supervisor. [Repealed.]

405.110.
Powers of supervisor. [Repealed.]

405.120.
Bond of supervisor. [Repealed.]

405.130.
Salary of supervisor. [Repealed.]